test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jalksh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - jaļkš: # Noun 143 'eng /est jaluts/fin' - full paradigm
     jaļkš+N+Sg+Nom: jaļkš
     jaļkš+N+Sg+Gen: jaļkš
     jaļkš+N+Sg+Par: jaļkšõ
     jaļkš+N+Sg+Dat: jaļkšõn
     jaļkš+N+Sg+Ins: jaļkšõks
     jaļkš+N+Sg+Ill: jaļkšõ
     jaļkš+N+Sg+Ela: jaļkšõst
     jaļkš+N+Pl+Nom: jaļkšõd
     jaļkš+N+Pl+Gen: jaļkšõd
     jaļkš+N+Pl+Par: jaļkšidi
     jaļkš+N+Pl+Dat: jaļkšõdõn
     jaļkš+N+Pl+Ins: jaļkšõdõks
     jaļkš+N+Pl+Ill: jaļkšiz
     jaļkš+N+Pl+Ela: jaļkšist
